Georgia, session 2025_26, HB472.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 16-11-127 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to carrying
weapons or long guns in unauthorized locations, is amended in subsection (b) by striking "or"
at the end of paragraph (6), by replacing the period with "; or" at the end of paragraph (7),
and by adding a new paragraph to read as follows:
"(8) Within facilities of the Geo. L. Smith II Georgia World Congress Center Authority,
as described in Code Section 10-9-14.1, which are enclosed by fencing that is at least 8
feet in height and includes prominent postings of notice of such restrictions at all access
points; provided, however, that such facility is not a location where vehicles are permitted
to park."
H. B. 472
- 1 -

LC 39 4587
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 472
- 2 -